District of Columbia statutes.
16-711

Restitution or reparation.

(a)

In criminal cases in the Superior Court, the court may, in addition to any other sentence imposed as a condition of probation or as a sentence itself, require a person convicted of any offense to make reasonable restitution or reparation.

(b)

When restitution or reparation is ordered, the court shall take into consideration the number of victims, the actual damage of each victim, the resources of the defendant, the defendant’s ability to earn, any obligation of the defendant to support dependents, and other matters as pertain to the defendant’s ability to make restitution or reparation.

(c)

The court shall fix the manner of performing restitution or reparation.

(d)

At any time during the probation period or period of restitution or reparation, the defendant may request and the court may grant a hearing on any matter related to the plan of restitution or reparation.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-202, § 2, 30 DCR 173

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-711.